West Virginia, session 2026, HB5174.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. WILDLIFE RESOURCES. §20-2-65. Gold-panning permitted; dates published. (a) The Division of Natural Resources shall authorize gold panning in West Virginia rivers and streams and shall designate times of year when gold panning is permissible depending in the spawning season on various rivers and streams in the state.  (b) A gold pan shall be used and a sluice that is no bigger than four inches wide.(c) After the establishment of the dates when gold panning is permitted, the Division of Natural Resources shall publish these dates for the interested public.